test/src/gt-norm.Teng-yamls/tengwar-spelling_gt-norm.Teng.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../src/generator-gt-norm.Teng.hfst
    Morph: ../../src/analyser-gt-norm.Teng.hfst

Tests:
  
  Invisible flag diacritics don't break things:
    sinda+A+Superl:   # superlative adjectival prefix, first flag
    vanwa+A:   # superlative adjectival prefix, second flag
    yondo+N+Sing+Voc:   # vocative flag at the start
    lav-+V+Past+Sing:   # perfective prefix, second flag
  
  Lexically/Etymologically specified spelling differences:
    # w and {w} are spelled with v/wilya, plain v spelled with vala
    aiwë+N+Sing+Nom: 
    vendë+N+Sing+Nom: 
    vanwa+A: 
    vanya+A: 
    # þ is spelled with sule, plain s with silme
    isil+N+Sing+Nom: 
    coimas+N+Sing+Nom: 
    # ñ is spelled with n(g)oldo, ñw with n(g)walme
    noldo+N+Sing+Nom: 
    nwalca+A: 
  
  Context-dependent alternations:
    # TODO: what should an initial h be?
    #  and ss are right-side-up or upside-down correctly
    lassë+N+Sing+Nom: 
    estel+N+Sing+Nom: 
    coimas+N+Plur+Nom: 
    # An s after a fitting consonant is done as a hook
    axo+N+Sing+Nom: 
    lapsë+N+Sing+Nom: 
    otso+Num+Card: 
    # Long carrier merges with things that have a long downward stem
    cálë+N+Sing+Nom: ‍
    tári+N+Sing+Nom: ‍
    cen-+V+Past+Perf+Sing: ‍
    # Consonant combinations
    quenta+N+Sing+Nom: 
    alda+N+Sing+Nom: 
    lav-+V+Past+Sing: 
    ango+N+Sing+Nom: 
    ango+N+Plur+Nom: 
    Varda+N+Prop+Sing+Nom: 
    imbë+Adp: 
    # Diphthongs
    cirya+N+Plur+Ins: 
    coimas+N+Sing+Nom: 
    nénu+N+Plur+Ins: 
    aurë+N+Sing+Nom: 
    ëa+V+Fut+Sing: 
    tiuco+N+Sing+Nom: 
    oio+Adv: 
    # Doubled consonants
    metta+N+Sing+Nom: 
    quinna+A: 
